Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-454
Solicitation for violation of code.

Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another or others to desert in violation of section 55-457 or mutiny in violation of section 55-466 shall, if the offense solicited or advised is attempted or committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense, but, if the offense solicited or advised is not committed or attempted, he shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 54, p. 1575.